California statutes. Penal Code
All Compacting States’ laws conflicting with this Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

Section B.Binding Effect of the Compact

All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all Rules and By-laws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the Compacting States.

All agreements between the Interstate Commission and
 the Compacting States are binding in accordance with their terms.

Upon the request of a party to a conflict over meaning or interpretation of Interstate Commission actions, and upon a majority vote of the Compacting States, the Interstate Commission may issue advisory opinions regarding meaning or interpretation.

In the event any provision of this Compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any Compacting State, the obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction sought to be conferred by the provision upon the Interstate Commission shall be ineffective and the obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction shall remain in the Compacting State and shall be exercised by the agency thereof to which the obligations, duties, powers or jurisdiction are delegated by law in effect at the time this Compact becomes effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 223.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

11181.

(a) There is hereby established the California Council for Interstate Adult Offender Supervision.

(b) The council shall exercise oversight and advocacy concerning its participation in Interstate Commission activities, and other duties as may be determined by the Legislature or Governor, including but not limited to, development of policy concerning operations and procedures of the compact within the state.

(c) There shall be seven members of the council. The Director of Corrections, or his or her designee, shall be a member and serve as the commissioner, who shall represent California and serve on the Interstate Commission for Adult Offender Supervision. The commissioner shall also be the Compact Administrator for the State of California for purposes of the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision. The Governor shall appoint three members, one of whom shall represent victims rights groups, and one of whom shall represent chief probation officers. One member each shall be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly. The Judicial Council shall appoint one superior court judge as a member.

(d) With the exception of the commissioner, each member of the council shall serve for a term of four years. Council members shall not be compensated, except for reasonable per diem expenses related to their
 work for council purposes.

(e) The council shall, not later than July 1, 2005, submit a report to the Legislature on the status of implementing the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision in California. The report shall clearly differentiate the role and responsibilities of the state Compact Administrator from local supervisory agencies and shall articulate the interdependence between the state Compact Administrator and other related entities, including, but not limited to, local supervisory agencies. Additionally, the report shall identify the process by which the State Council communicates with county probation offices and Superior courts to ensure the state’s compliance with the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1078, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Interstate Corrections Compacts [11189. - 11198.]

11189.

The Interstate Corrections Compact as set forth in this section is hereby adopted and entered into with all other jurisdictions joining therein. The provisions of the interstate compact are as follows:
INTERSTATE CORRECTIONS COMPACT

This section may be cited as the Interstate Corrections Compact.

The Interstate Corrections Compact is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this state with any other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows: 
Interstate Corrections Compact
Article I
Purpose and Policy
The party states, desiring by common action to fully utilize and improve their institutional facilities and provide adequate programs for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such facilities and programs on a basis of cooperation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of such offenders and of society and effecting economies in capital expenditures and operational costs. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the mutual development and execution of such programs of cooperation for the confinement, treatment and
 rehabilitation of offenders with the most economical use of human and material resources. 
Article II
Definitions
As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “State” means a state of the United States; the United States of America; a territory or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia; the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

(b) “Sending state” means a state party to this compact in which conviction or court commitment was had.

(c) “Receiving state” means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction or court commitment
 was had.

(d) “Inmate” means a male or female offender who is committed, under sentence to or confined in a penal or correctional institution.

(e) “Institution” means any penal or correctional facility, including but not limited to a facility for the mentally ill or mentally defective, in which inmates as defined in (d) above may lawfully be confined. 
Article III
Contracts
(a) Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states. Any such contract shall provide for:

1. Its duration.

2. Payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and any participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance.

3. Participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on account thereof; and the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting therefrom.

4. Delivery and retaking of inmates.

5. Such other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities and rights of the sending and receiving states.

(b) The terms and provisions of this compact shall be a part of any contract entered into by the authority of or pursuant thereto, and nothing in any such contract shall be inconsistent therewith. 
Article IV
Procedures and Rights
(a) Whenever the duly constituted authorities in a state party to this compact, and which has entered into a contract pursuant to Article III, shall decide that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary or desirable in order to provide adequate quarters and care or an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, said officials may direct that the confinement be within an institution within the territory of said other party state,
 the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

(b) The appropriate officials of any state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to any institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its inmates as may be confined in the institution.

(c) Inmates confined in an institution pursuant to the terms of this compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction of the sending state and may at any time be removed therefrom for transfer to a prison or other institution within the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state;
 provided that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be required pursuant to the terms of any contract entered into under the terms of Article III.

(d) Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions pursuant to this compact including a conduct record of each inmate and certify said record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have official review of his or her record in determining and altering the disposition of said inmate in accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state.

(e) All inmates who may be confined in an institution pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be
 treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution. The fact of confinement in a receiving state shall not deprive any inmate so confined of any legal rights which said inmate would have had if confined in an appropriate institution of the sending state.

(f) Any hearing or hearings to which an inmate confined pursuant to this compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state, or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. In the event such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. Said record
 together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state.

(g) Any inmate confined pursuant to this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, shall agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory.

(h) Any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact shall have any and all rights to participate in and derive any
 benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations or have such obligations modified or his status changed on account of any action or proceeding in which he could have participated if confined in any appropriate institution of the sending state located within such state. 

(i) The parent, guardian, trustee, or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for, advise, or otherwise function with respect to any inmate shall not be deprived of or restricted in his exercise of any power in respect of any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact. 
Article V
Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving State: Extradition
(a) Any decision of the sending state in respect of any matter over which it retains
 jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is formally accused of having committed within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of proceeding, imprisonment or detention for such offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference.

(b) An inmate who escapes from an institution in which he is confined pursuant to this compact shall be deemed a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated. In
 the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition or rendition proceedings shall be that of the sending state, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee. 
Article VI
Federal Aid
Any state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with any institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or any contract pursuant hereto and any inmate in a receiving state pursuant to this compact may participate in any such federally aided program or activity for which the sending and receiving states have made contractual provision, provided that if such
 program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen, the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required therefor. 
Article VII
Entry Into Force
This compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two states. Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states upon similar action by such state. 
Article VIII
Withdrawal and Termination
This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it shall have enacted a
 statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states. An actual withdrawal shall not take effect until one year after the notices provided in said statute have been sent. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact. 
Article IX
Other Arrangements Unaffected
Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a nonparty state for the
 confinement, rehabilitation or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of cooperative institutional arrangements. 
Article X
Construction and Severability
The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full
 force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

11190.

The Western Interstate Corrections Compact as contained herein is hereby enacted into law and entered into on behalf of this State with any and all other states legally joining therein in a form substantially as follows:
Western Interstate Corrections Compact
Article I
Purpose and Policy

The party states, desiring by common action to improve their institutional facilities and provide programs
 of sufficiently high quality for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of various types of offenders, declare that it is the policy of each of the party states to provide such facilities and programs on a basis of co-operation with one another, thereby serving the best interests of such offenders and of society. The purpose of this compact is to provide for the development and execution of such programs of co-operation for the confinement, treatment and rehabilitation of offenders. 
Article II
Definitions
As used in this compact, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “State” means a state of the United States, or, subject to the limitation contained in Article VII, Guam.

(b) “Sending state” means a state party to this compact in which conviction was had.

(c) “Receiving state” means a state party to this compact to which an inmate is sent for confinement other than a state in which conviction was had.

(d) “Inmate” means a male or female offender who is under sentence to or confined in a prison or other correctional institution.

(e) “Institution” means any prison, reformatory or other correctional facility (including but not limited to a facility for the mentally ill or mentally defective) in which inmates may lawfully be confined. 
Article III
Contracts
(a) Each party state may make one or more contracts with any one or more of the other party states for the confinement of inmates on behalf of a sending state in institutions situated within receiving states. Any such contract shall provide for:

1. Its duration.

2. Payments to be made to the receiving state by the sending state for inmate maintenance, extraordinary medical and dental expenses, and any participation in or receipt by inmates of rehabilitative or correctional services, facilities, programs or treatment not reasonably included as part of normal maintenance.

3. Participation in programs of inmate employment, if any; the disposition or crediting of any payments received by inmates on accounts thereof; and
 the crediting of proceeds from or disposal of any products resulting therefrom.

4. Delivery and retaking of inmates.

5. Such other matters as may be necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities and rights of the sending and receiving states.

(b) Prior to the construction or completion of construction of any institution or addition thereto by a party state, any other party state or states may contract therewith for the enlargement of the planned capacity of the institution or addition thereto, or for the inclusion therein of particular equipment or structures, and for the reservation of a specific per centum of the capacity of the institution to be kept available for use by inmates of the sending state or states so contracting. Any sending state so contracting may, to the extent that moneys are
 legally available therefor, pay to the receiving state, a reasonable sum as consideration for such enlargement of capacity, or provision of equipment or structures, and reservation of capacity. Such payment may be in a lump sum or in installments as provided in the contract.

(c) The terms and provisions of this compact shall be a part of any contract entered into by the authority of or pursuant thereto, and nothing in any such contract shall be inconsistent therewith. 
Article IV
Procedures and Rights
(a) Whenever the duly constituted judicial or administrative authorities in a state party to this compact, and which has entered into a contract pursuant to Article III, shall decide
 that confinement in, or transfer of an inmate to, an institution within the territory of another party state is necessary in order to provide adequate quarters and care or desirable in order to provide an appropriate program of rehabilitation or treatment, said officials may direct that the confinement be within an institution within the territory of said other party state, the receiving state to act in that regard solely as agent for the sending state.

(b) The appropriate officials of any state party to this compact shall have access, at all reasonable times, to any institution in which it has a contractual right to confine inmates for the purpose of inspecting the facilities thereof and visiting such of its inmates as may be confined in the institution.

(c) Inmates confined in an institution pursuant to the terms of this compact shall at all times be subject to the jurisdiction
 of the sending state and may at any time be removed therefrom for transfer to a prison or other institution within the sending state, for transfer to another institution in which the sending state may have a contractual or other right to confine inmates, for release on probation or parole, for discharge, or for any other purpose permitted by the laws of the sending state; provided that the sending state shall continue to be obligated to such payments as may be required pursuant to the terms of any contract entered into under the terms of Article III.

(d) Each receiving state shall provide regular reports to each sending state on the inmates of that sending state in institutions pursuant to this compact including a conduct record of each inmate and certify said record to the official designated by the sending state, in order that each inmate may have the benefit of his or her record in determining and altering the disposition of said inmate in
 accordance with the law which may obtain in the sending state and in order that the same may be a source of information for the sending state.

(e) All inmates who may be confined in an institution pursuant to the provisions of this compact shall be treated in a reasonable and humane manner and shall be cared for and treated equally with such similar inmates of the receiving state as may be confined in the same institution. The fact of confinement in a receiving state shall not deprive any inmate so confined of any legal rights which said inmate would have had if confined in an appropriate institution of the sending state.

(f) Any hearing or hearings to which an inmate confined pursuant to this compact may be entitled by the laws of the sending state may be had before the appropriate authorities of the sending state, or of the receiving state if authorized by the sending state. The
 receiving state shall provide adequate facilities for such hearings as may be conducted by the appropriate officials of a sending state. In the event such hearing or hearings are had before officials of the receiving state, the governing law shall be that of the sending state and a record of the hearing or hearings as prescribed by the sending state shall be made. Said record together with any recommendations of the hearing officials shall be transmitted forthwith to the official or officials before whom the hearing would have been had if it had taken place in the sending state. In any and all proceedings had pursuant to the provisions of this subdivision, the officials of the receiving state shall act solely as agents of the sending state and no final determination shall be made in any matter except by the appropriate officials of the sending state. Costs of records made pursuant to this subdivision shall be borne by the sending state.

(g) Any
 inmate confined pursuant to this compact shall be released within the territory of the sending state unless the inmate, and the sending and receiving states, shall agree upon release in some other place. The sending state shall bear the cost of such return to its territory.

(h) Any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact shall have any and all rights to participate in and derive any benefits or incur or be relieved of any obligations or have such obligations modified or his status changed on account of any action or proceeding in which he could have participated if confined in any appropriate institution of the sending state located within such state.

(i) The parent, guardian, trustee, or other person or persons entitled under the laws of the sending state to act for, advise, or otherwise function with respect to any inmate shall not be deprived of or restricted in
 his exercise of any power in respect of any inmate confined pursuant to the terms of this compact. 
Article V
Acts Not Reviewable in Receiving State; Extradition
(a) Any decision of the sending state in respect of any matter over which it retains jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall be conclusive upon and not reviewable within the receiving state, but if at the time the sending state seeks to remove an inmate from an institution in the receiving state there is pending against the inmate within such state any criminal charge or if the inmate is suspected of having committed within such state a criminal offense, the inmate shall not be returned without the consent of the receiving state until discharged from prosecution or other form of
 proceeding, imprisonment or detention for such offense. The duly accredited officers of the sending state shall be permitted to transport inmates pursuant to this compact through any and all states party to this compact without interference.

(b) An inmate who escapes from an institution in which he is confined pursuant to this compact shall be deemed a fugitive from the sending state and from the state in which the institution is situated. In the case of an escape to a jurisdiction other than the sending or receiving state, the responsibility for institution of extradition proceedings shall be that of the sending state, but nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent or affect the activities of officers and agencies of any jurisdiction directed toward the apprehension and return of an escapee. 
Article VI
Federal Aid
Any state party to this compact may accept federal aid for use in connection with any institution or program, the use of which is or may be affected by this compact or any contract pursuant hereto and any inmate in a receiving state pursuant to this compact may participate in any such federally aided program or activity for which the sending and receiving states have made contractual provision provided that if such program or activity is not part of the customary correctional regimen the express consent of the appropriate official of the sending state shall be required therefor. 
Article VII
Entry Into Force
This compact shall enter into
 force and become effective and binding upon the states so acting when it has been enacted into law by any two contiguous states from among the States of Alaska, Arizona, California, Colorado, Hawaii, Idaho, Montana, Nebraska, Nevada, New Mexico, Oregon, Utah, Washington and Wyoming. For the purpose of this article, Alaska and Hawaii shall be deemed contiguous to each other; to any and all of the States of California, Oregon and Washington; and to Guam. Thereafter, this compact shall enter into force and become effective and binding as to any other of said states, or any other state contiguous to at least one party state upon similar action by such state. Guam may become party to this compact by taking action similar to that provided for joinder by any other eligible party state and upon the consent of Congress to such joinder. For the purposes of this article, Guam shall be deemed contiguous to Alaska, Hawaii, California, Oregon and Washington. 
Article VIII
Withdrawal and Termination
This compact shall continue in force and remain binding upon a party state until it shall have enacted a statute repealing the same and providing for the sending of formal written notice of withdrawal from the compact to the appropriate officials of all other party states. An actual withdrawal shall not take effect until two years after the notices provided in said statute have been sent. Such withdrawal shall not relieve the withdrawing state from its obligations assumed hereunder prior to the effective date of withdrawal. Before the effective date of withdrawal, a withdrawing state shall remove to its territory, at its own expense, such inmates as it may have confined pursuant to the provisions of this compact. 
Article IX
Other Arrangements Unaffected
Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to abrogate or impair any agreement or other arrangement which a party state may have with a nonparty state for the confinement, rehabilitation or treatment of inmates nor to repeal any other laws of a party state authorizing the making of co-operative institutional arrangements. 
Article X
Construction and Severability
The provisions of this compact shall be liberally construed and shall be severable. If any phrase, clause, sentence or
 provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any participating state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

11191.

(a) Any court or other agency or officer of this state having power to commit or transfer an inmate, as defined in Article II(d) of the Interstate Corrections Compact or of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact, to any institution for confinement may commit or transfer that inmate to any institution within or outside of this state if this state has entered into a contract or contracts for the confinement of inmates in that institution pursuant to Article III of the Interstate Corrections Compact or of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact.

(b) No inmate sentenced under California law may be committed or transferred to an institution outside of this state, unless he or she has executed a written consent to the
 transfer. The inmate shall have the right to a private consultation with an attorney of his choice, or with a public defender if the inmate cannot afford counsel, concerning his rights and obligations under this section, and shall be informed of those rights prior to executing the written consent. At any time more than five years after the transfer, the inmate shall be entitled to revoke his consent and to transfer to an institution in this state. In such cases, the transfer shall occur within the next 30 days.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 310, Sec. 18) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 34.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

11192.

The courts, departments, agencies and officers of this State and its subdivisions shall enforce this compact and shall do all things appropriate to the effectuation of its purposes and intent which may be within their respective jurisdictions including but not limited to the making and submission of such reports as are required by the compact.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

11193.

Any inmate sentenced under California law who is imprisoned in another state, pursuant to a compact, shall be entitled to all hearings, within 120 days of the time and under the same standards, which are normally accorded to persons similarly sentenced who are confined in institutions in this state. If the inmate consents in writing, such hearings may be conducted by the corresponding agencies or officials of such other jurisdiction. The Board of Prison Terms or its duly authorized representative is hereby authorized and directed to hold such hearings as may be requested by such other jurisdiction or the inmate pursuant to this section or to Article IV (f) of the Interstate
 Corrections Compact or of the Western Interstate Corrections Compact.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

11194.

The Director of Corrections is hereby empowered to enter into such contracts on behalf of this state as may be appropriate to implement the participation of this state in the Interstate Corrections Compact and the Western Interstate Corrections Compact pursuant to Article III thereof. No such contract shall be of any force or effect until approved by the Director of General Services. Such contracts may authorize confinement of inmates in, or transfer of inmates from, only such institutions in this state as are under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, and no such contract may provide for transfer out of this state of any person committed to the custody of the
 Director of the Youth Authority. No such contract may authorize the confinement of an inmate, who is in the custody of the Director of Corrections, in an institution of a state other than a state that is a party to the Interstate Corrections Compact or to the Western Interstate Corrections Compact. The Director of Corrections, subject to the approval of the Board of Prison Terms, must first determine, on the basis of an inspection made by his direction, that such institution of another state is a suitable place for confinement of prisoners committed to his custody before entering into a contract permitting such confinement, and shall, at least annually, redetermine the suitability of such confinement. In determining the suitability of such institution of another state, the director shall assure himself that such institution maintains standards of care and discipline not incompatible with those of the State of California and that all inmates therein are treated equitably, regardless of race, religion, color,
 creed or national origin.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 255.)
-------------------------------------------

11194.5.

(a) At the request of the board of supervisors of any county that is adjacent to another state, the county sheriff shall negotiate with the appropriate officials of the adjacent state to contract pursuant to the authority of Article III of a compact executed under Section 11189 or 11190 for the confinement of county jail prisoners in corresponding facilities located in the adjacent state. The sheriff shall determine that the corresponding facilities are a suitable place of confinement of prisoners submitted to his or her custody and shall at least annually redetermine the suitability as a precondition to
 any contract under this section. In determining the suitability of the facilities of the other states, the sheriff shall assure himself or herself that it maintains standards of care and discipline not incompatible with those of this state and that all inmates therein are treated equally, regardless of race, religion, color, creed, or national origin.

(b) With the approval of the board of supervisors including agreement as to terms for payments to be made for prisoner maintenance and expenses, the county sheriff may enter into a contract negotiated under subdivision (a).

(c) No prisoner may be transferred to an institution outside of this state under this section unless he or she has executed a written consent to the transfer. 

(d) Any person who was sent to another state from a county under the authority of this
 section shall be released within the territory of the county unless the person, the sheriff of the sending county, and the corresponding official or agency of the other state shall agree upon release in another place. The county shall bear the cost of transporting the person to the place of release.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 860, Sec. 1.   Effective September 17, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

11195.

Every prisoner released from a prison without this state to which he has been committed or transferred from this state pursuant to this article shall be entitled to the same benefits, including, but not limited to money and tools, as are allowed to a prisoner released from a prison in this state. Any person who has been sent to another state for confinement pursuant to this article shall be released within the territory of this state unless the person, the Director of Corrections of California, and the corresponding agency or official of the other state shall agree upon release in some other place. This state shall bear the cost of transporting the person to the place of
 release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

11196.

The provisions of this article shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this article is declared to be unconstitutional or the applicability thereof to any state, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of this article and the applicability thereof to any other state, agency, person or circumstance shall, with respect to all severable matters, not be affected thereby. It is the legislative intent that the provisions of this article be reasonably and liberally construed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1397.)
-------------------------------------------

11197.

No person sentenced under California law who is committed or transferred to an institution outside of this state shall be competent to testify for the prosecution in any criminal proceeding in this state unless counsel for each defendant in such proceeding is notified that the prosecution may call the person as a witness and is given an opportunity to interview the person no less than 10 days before the commencement of the proceeding or, in the event the prosecution is not at that time considering the possibility of using such testimony, the notice and opportunity for interview shall be given at the earliest possible time. Nothing in this section shall be construed to compel
 the prisoner to submit to such an interview.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 667.)
-------------------------------------------

11198.

(a) Except as authorized by California statute, no city, county, city and county, or private entity shall cause to be brought into, housed in, confined in, or detained in this state any person sentenced to serve a criminal commitment under the authority of any jurisdiction outside of California.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that this act shall neither prohibit nor authorize the confinement of federal prisoners in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 707, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Reports of Animal Cruelty, Abuse, or Neglect [11199. - 11199.]

11199.
